Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2571.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17.4-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17.4 entitled "Assisted
Living Residence Licensing Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17.4-10. Regulations, inspections, and investigations.
(a) The licensing agency shall after public hearing pursuant to reasonable notice, adopt,
amend, promulgate, and enforce any rules, regulations, and standards with respect to assisted-living
residences for adults licensed under this chapter as may be designed to further the accomplishment
of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe and adequate living environments for individuals
in assisted-living residences in the interest of public safety and welfare. These regulations may
provide for the establishment of levels of service provided by the residence.
(b) The licensing agency shall make or cause to be made any inspections and investigations
that it deems necessary by duly authorized agents of the director at any time and frequency
determined by the licensing agency. The licensing agency shall establish regulations to determine
the frequency of inspections that shall include, but not be limited to, the residence’s past compliance
with regulations, complaint investigations, quality of care issues and license type. However, the
licensing agency shall:
(1) On, on a biennial basis, conduct an unannounced, on-site inspection of all licensed
assisted-living residences; and
(2) On an annual basis, conduct an unannounced, on-site inspection of those assisted living

residences that provide services to residents with Alzheimer's disease or other dementias by means
of an Alzheimer's special care unit, in accordance with § 23-17.4-16.2 which inspection shall
include the entire assisted living residence and not be limited to the Alzheimer's special care unit.
The licensing agency shall, on an annual basis, cause no less than ten percent (10%) of all
assisted-living inspections to be conducted, in whole or in part, on nights and/or weekends.
(c) Upon request of the licensing agency, health agencies and professionals may share
resident health status information with the department of health for the purpose of determining each
resident’s capability of self preservation.
(d) Each assisted-living residence licensed under this chapter shall have a plan for
preventing the hazards of residents wandering from the facility. This plan shall be submitted to the
licensing agency in a format determined by the director.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004794
========
LC004794 - Page 2 of 3